Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.69, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Machinery, equipment, and fencing. The following machinery, equipment, and fencing is exempt: (1) farm machinery; (2) logging equipment, including chain saws used for commercial logging; (3) fencing used for the containment of farmed Cervidae, as defined in section 35.153, subdivision 3; (4) primary and backup generator units used to generate electricity for the purpose of operating farm machinery, aquacultural production equipment, or logging equipment, or providing light or space heating necessary for the production of livestock, dairy animals, dairy products, or poultry and poultry products; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) aquaculture production equipmentnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) fencing, including materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, improvement, repair, or replacement of fencing, used directly and principally in agricultural production of tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retailnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end